District of Columbia statutes.
16-3703

Affidavit; contents.

At the time of filing a complaint in replevin, the plaintiff, his agent, or attorney shall file an affidavit stating that —

(1)

according to affiant’s information and belief, the plaintiff is entitled to recover possession of chattels proposed to be replevied, being the same described in the complaint;

(2)

the defendant has seized and detained or detains the chattels; and

(3)

the chattels were not subject to the seizure or detention and were not taken upon a writ of replevin between the parties.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 604, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-3703.
1973 Ed., § 16-3703.